Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3907
Demand upon security; authorized; abatement; when.

(1) To enforce collection of any tax not paid when due, the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor may make demand upon any security which is provided for by law and which has been submitted to the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor on behalf of the person liable for the tax, together with any interest, penalties, additions to tax, and costs thereon. The security may, if necessary, be sold by the Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor in the manner provided by section 77-27,131.

(2) The Tax Commissioner or Commissioner of Labor may abate the unpaid portion of the assessment of any tax, or other liability in respect thereof, if he or she determines that the administration and collection costs involved would not warrant collection of the amount due.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 220;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 183;

Laws 1999, LB 165, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 93.